Massachusetts, session 194th, H2391.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 78 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Contract for health club 
services” the following definition:-  
“Facility”, a public stadium, sports center, gymnasium or other facility hosting or 
providing for an athletic or sporting event.  
SECTION 2. Said chapter 93 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 78A 
the following section:-  
Section 87A. (a) A facility shall have on the premises at least 1 AED, as defined in 
section 12V ½ of chapter 112, and shall have in attendance during any sporting activity taking 
place at the facility, or while rendering services to the public for such sporting at the facility, at 
least 1 employee or authorized volunteer as an AED provider, as defined in said section 12V ½ 
of said chapter 112. 

of 2 13  (b)(1) While any sporting activity is taking place there shall be in attendance: (i) at least 1 
employee of the facility that has completed a training course in cardiopulmonary resuscitation 
and in the use of an automated external defibrillator in accordance with the standards established 
by the American Heart Association, Inc. or the American National Red Cross; or (ii) a volunteer 
that has completed a training course in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and in the use of an 
automated external defibrillator in accordance with the standards established by the American 
Heart Association, Inc. or the American National Red Cross.  
(2) If no employee or volunteer is available, as provided in paragraph (1), the operator, or 
a designated agent of the operator, of the facility shall make best efforts to identify readily 
available volunteers present at the facility; provided, that any volunteer shall be trained in the use 
of an automated external facility as provided in clause (ii) of paragraph (1). The request for 
volunteers may be made through a public announcement. The announcement shall include: (i) 
identifying the location of AEDs in the facility; (ii) identifying the employee or volunteer trained 
in the use of an automated external defibrillator; and (iii) the procedure for identifying readily 
available volunteers trained in the use of an automated external defibrillator present during the 
sporting event, which may include physical recognition such as standing to be recognized, 
raising a hand or otherwise communicating a willingness to volunteer or by electronic 
communication via mobile phone or other device.  
(c) A placard shall be installed at every facility entryway with a map of the location of 
any automated external defibrillator at the facility